Illinois, session 104th, HB4369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Section 50-26 and by adding Article 85 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-26)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-26. Application for license. Applications for 9licenses shall be made to the Department on forms prescribed 10by the Department and accompanied by the required fee. All 11applications shall contain the information that, in the 12judgment of the Department, will enable the Department to pass 13on the qualifications of the applicant for a license under 14this Act.15    If an applicant fails to obtain a license under this Act 16within 3 years after filing his or her application, the 17application shall be denied. The applicant may make a new 18application, which shall be accompanied by the required 19nonrefundable fee. The applicant shall be required to meet the 20qualifications required for licensure at the time of 21reapplication.22    The Department may establish, by rule, fees to be charged 23for the purpose of implementing and enforcing the provisions   HB4369- 2 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1of this Act, including the fees necessary to implement the 2Nurse Licensure Compact under Article 85. On or after the 3effective date of the Nurse Licensure Compact under Article 485, the Department may set the required fees to apply for a 5multistate license, upgrade from a single state license to a 6multistate license, and renew a multistate license. The 7initial application fee for a multistate license issued under 8this Section shall be no less than $150. The biennial 9multistate license renewal fee shall be no less than $125. 10(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.)". 11    (225 ILCS 65/Art. 85 heading new)12ARTICLE 85. NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT 13    (225 ILCS 65/85-5 new)14    Sec. 85-5. Nurse Licensure Compact. The State of Illinois 15ratifies and approves the following Compact: 16ARTICLE I 17Findings and Declaration of Purpose 18    a. The party states find that:19        1. The health and safety of the public are affected by 20    the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of 21    enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure 22    laws;  HB4369- 3 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws 2    regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or 3    harm to the public;4        3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of 5    advanced communication technologies as part of our 6    nation's health care delivery system require greater 7    coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of 8    nurse licensure and regulation;9        4. New practice modalities and technology make 10    compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws 11    difficult and complex;12        5. The current system of duplicative licensure for 13    nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and 14    redundant for both nurses and states; and15        6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements 16    throughout the states promotes public safety and public 17    health benefits. 18    b. The general purposes of this Compact are to: 19        1. Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect 20    the public's health and safety;21        2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party 22    states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;23        3. Facilitate the exchange of information between 24    party states in the areas of nurse regulation, 25    investigation and adverse actions;26        4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the   HB4369- 4 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    practice of nursing in each jurisdiction;2        5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold 3    a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in 4    the state in which the patient is located at the time care 5    is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state 6    licenses; 7        6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and 8    issuance of nurse licenses; and9        7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by 10    nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements.  11ARTICLE II 12Definitions 13    As used in this Compact:14        a. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, 15    equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws 16    which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority 17    against a nurse, including actions against an individual's 18    license or multistate licensure privilege such as 19    revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 20    licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any 21    other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's 22    authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease 23    and desist action.24        b. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary   HB4369- 5 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    monitoring program approved by a licensing board.2        c. "Coordinated licensure information system" means an 3    integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing 4    information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities 5    related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a 6    nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by 7    licensing boards.8        d. "Current significant investigative information" 9    means:10            1. Investigative information that a licensing 11        board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes 12        notification and an opportunity for the nurse to 13        respond, if required by state law, has reason to 14        believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would 15        indicate more than a minor infraction; or16            2. Investigative information that indicates that 17        the nurse represents an immediate threat to public 18        health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has 19        been notified and had an opportunity to respond.20        e. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, 21    or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice 22    of nursing imposed by a licensing board.23        f. "Home state" means the party state which is the 24    nurse's primary state of residence.25        g. "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory 26    body responsible for issuing nurse licenses.  HB4369- 6 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        h. "Multistate license" means a license to practice as 2    a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse 3    (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that 4    authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party 5    states under a multistate licensure privilege.6        i. "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal 7    authorization associated with a multistate license 8    permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered 9    nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state.10        j. "Nurse" means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are 11    defined by each party state's practice laws.12        k. "Party state" means any state that has adopted this 13    Compact.14        l. "Remote state" means a party state, other than the 15    home state.16        m. "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued 17    by a party state that authorizes practice only within the 18    issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure 19    privilege to practice in any other party state.20        n. "State" means a state, territory or possession of 21    the United States and the District of Columbia.22        o. "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, 23    rules and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, 24    define the scope of nursing practice, and create the 25    methods and grounds for imposing discipline. "State 26    practice laws" do not include requirements necessary to   HB4369- 7 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or 2    requirements of the home state.  3ARTICLE III 4General Provisions and Jurisdiction 5    a. A multistate license to practice registered or licensed 6practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a 7resident in that state will be recognized by each party state 8as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) 9or as a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a 10multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.11    b. A state must implement procedures for considering the 12criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate 13license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall 14include the submission of fingerprints or other 15biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of 16obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information 17from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency 18responsible for retaining that state's criminal records.19    c. Each party state shall require the following for an 20applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home 21state:22        1. Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure 23    or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable 24    state laws;  HB4369- 8 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a 2    licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure 3    education program; or4        ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN 5    prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved 6    by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable 7    country and (b) has been verified by an independent 8    credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing 9    board-approved prelicensure education program;10        3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure 11    education program not taught in English or if English is 12    not the individual's native language, successfully passed 13    an English proficiency examination that includes the 14    components of reading, speaking, writing and listening;15        4. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® or NCLEX-PN® 16    Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;17        5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered 18    license;19        6. Has submitted, in connection with an application 20    for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, 21    fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of 22    obtaining criminal history record information from the 23    Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible 24    for retaining that state's criminal records;25        7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has 26    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense   HB4369- 9 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    under applicable state or federal criminal law;2        8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has 3    entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor 4    offense related to the practice of nursing as determined 5    on a case-by-case basis;6        9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative 7    program;8        10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements 9    regarding current participation in an alternative program; 10    and11        11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.12    d. All party states shall be authorized, in accordance 13with existing state due process law, to take adverse action 14against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as 15revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that 16affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate 17licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a 18party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the 19administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. 20The administrator of the coordinated licensure information 21system shall promptly notify the home state of any such 22actions by remote states.23    e. A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the 24state practice laws of the state in which the client is located 25at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not 26limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing   HB4369- 10 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party 2state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing 3in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will 4subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, 5the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client 6is located at the time service is provided.7    f. Individuals not residing in a party state shall 8continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state 9license as provided under the laws of each party state. 10However, the single-state license granted to these individuals 11will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice 12nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact 13shall affect the requirements established by a party state for 14the issuance of a single-state license.15    g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on 16the effective date of this Compact, may retain and renew the 17multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home 18state, provided that:19        1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence 20    after this Compact's effective date, must meet all 21    applicable Article III.c. requirements to obtain a 22    multistate license from a new home state.23        2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate 24    licensure requirements in Article III.c. due to a 25    disqualifying event occurring after this Compact's 26    effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a   HB4369- 11 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license 2    shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with 3    applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of 4    Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("Commission").  5ARTICLE IV 6Applications for Licensure in a Party State 7    a. Upon application for a multistate license, the 8licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, 9through the coordinated licensure information system, whether 10the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license 11issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances 12on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 13applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against 14any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 15applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating 16in an alternative program.17    b. A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the 18home state, in only one party state at a time.19    c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 20between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure 21in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the 22prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with 23applicable rules adopted by the Commission.24        1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a   HB4369- 12 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    change in primary state of residence.2        2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new 3    home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence 4    of a change in primary state of residence to the new home 5    state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain 6    a multistate license from the new home state.7    d. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 8from a party state to a non-party state, the multistate 9license issued by the prior home state will convert to a 10single-state license, valid only in the former home state.  11ARTICLE V 12Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing 13Boards 14    a. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, 15a licensing board shall have the authority to: 16        1. Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate 17    licensure privilege to practice within that party state.18            i. Only the home state shall have the power to take 19        adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the 20        home state.21            ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the 22        home state licensing board shall give the same 23        priority and effect to reported conduct received from 24        a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred   HB4369- 13 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        within the home state. In so doing, the home state 2        shall apply its own state laws to determine 3        appropriate action.4        2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an 5    encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that 6    party state.7        3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who 8    changes primary state of residence during the course of 9    such investigations. The licensing board shall also have 10    the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall 11    promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to 12    the administrator of the coordinated licensure information 13    system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure 14    information system shall promptly notify the new home 15    state of any such actions.16        4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 17    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 18    of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. 19    Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for 20    the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 21    production of evidence from another party state shall be 22    enforced in the latter state by any court of competent 23    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 24    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 25    pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any 26    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees   HB4369- 14 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    required by the service statutes of the state in which the 2    witnesses or evidence are located.3        5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure 4    applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based 5    information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 6    criminal background checks, receive the results of the 7    Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal 8    background checks and use the results in making licensure 9    decisions.10        6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from 11    the affected nurse the costs of investigations and 12    disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action 13    taken against that nurse.14        7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings 15    of the remote state, provided that the licensing board 16    follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.17    b. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a 18nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure 19privilege to practice in all other party states shall be 20deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the 21multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that 22impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license 23shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate 24licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during 25the pendency of the order.26    c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state's   HB4369- 15 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1decision that participation in an alternative program may be 2used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board 3shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the 4multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the 5nurse's participation in an alternative program.  6ARTICLE VI 7Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of 8Information 9    a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated 10licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses 11(RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). 12This system will include information on the licensure and 13disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party 14states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and 15enforcement efforts.16    b. The Commission, in consultation with the administrator 17of the coordinated licensure information system, shall 18formulate necessary and proper procedures for the 19identification, collection and exchange of information under 20this Compact.21    c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the 22coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, 23any current significant investigative information, denials of 24applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse   HB4369- 16 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1participation in alternative programs known to the licensing 2board regardless of whether such participation is deemed 3nonpublic or confidential under state law.4    d. Current significant investigative information and 5participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative 6programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated 7licensure information system only to party state licensing 8boards.9    e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party 10state licensing boards contributing information to the 11coordinated licensure information system may designate 12information that may not be shared with non-party states or 13disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express 14permission of the contributing state.15    f. Any personally identifiable information obtained from 16the coordinated licensure information system by a party state 17licensing board shall not be shared with non-party states or 18disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the 19extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing 20the information.21    g. Any information contributed to the coordinated 22licensure information system that is subsequently required to 23be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that 24information shall also be expunged from the coordinated 25licensure information system.26    h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall   HB4369- 17 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1furnish a uniform data set to the Compact administrator of 2each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:3        1. Identifying information;4        2. Licensure data;5        3. Information related to alternative program 6    participation; and7        4. Other information that may facilitate the 8    administration of this Compact, as determined by 9    Commission rules.10    i. The Compact administrator of a party state shall 11provide all investigative documents and information requested 12by another party state.  13ARTICLE VII 14Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure 15Compact Administrators 16    a. The party states hereby create and establish a joint 17public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse 18Licensure Compact Administrators.19        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party 20    states.21        2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or 22    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 23    exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where 24    the principal office of the Commission is located. The   HB4369- 18 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 2    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in 3    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.4        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 5    waiver of sovereign immunity.6    b. Membership, Voting and Meetings7        1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one 8    administrator. The head of the state licensing board or 9    designee shall be the administrator of this Compact for 10    each party state. Any administrator may be removed or 11    suspended from office as provided by the law of the state 12    from which the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy 13    occurring in the Commission shall be filled in accordance 14    with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy 15    exists.16        2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) 17    vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation 18    of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 19    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. 20    An administrator shall vote in person or by such other 21    means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide 22    for an administrator's participation in meetings by 23    telephone or other means of communication.24        3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 25    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 26    forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.  HB4369- 19 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and 2    public notice of meetings shall be given in the same 3    manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in 4    Article VIII.5        5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic 6    meeting if the Commission must discuss:7            i. Noncompliance of a party state with its 8        obligations under this Compact;9            ii. The employment, compensation, discipline or 10        other personnel matters, practices or procedures 11        related to specific employees or other matters related 12        to the Commission's internal personnel practices and 13        procedures;14            iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated 15        litigation;16            iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or 17        sale of goods, services or real estate;18            v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 19        censuring any person;20            vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 21        financial information that is privileged or 22        confidential;23            vii. Disclosure of information of a personal 24        nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly 25        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;26            viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled   HB4369- 20 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        for law enforcement purposes;2            ix. Disclosure of information related to any 3        reports prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for 4        the purpose of investigation of compliance with this 5        Compact; or6            x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 7        by federal or state statute.8        6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 9    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 10    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 11    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The 12    Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly 13    describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall 14    provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and 15    the reasons therefor, including a description of the views 16    expressed. All documents considered in connection with an 17    action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes 18    and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, 19    subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or 20    order of a court of competent jurisdiction.21    c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the 22administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its 23conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the 24purposes and exercise the powers of this Compact, including 25but not limited to:26        1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;  HB4369- 21 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:2            i. For the establishment and meetings of other 3        committees; and4            ii. Governing any general or specific delegation 5        of any authority or function of the Commission;6        3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and 7    conducting meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable 8    advance notice of all meetings and providing an 9    opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested 10    parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect 11    the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and 12    proprietary information, including trade secrets. The 13    Commission may meet in closed session only after a 14    majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in 15    whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission 16    must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting 17    revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy 18    votes allowed;19        4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and 20    reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of 21    the Commission;22        5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for 23    the establishment of the personnel policies and programs 24    of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or 25    other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall 26    exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of   HB4369- 22 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    the Commission; and2        6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations 3    of the Commission and the equitable disposition of any 4    surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this 5    Compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts 6    and obligations;7    d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and 8any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of 9the Commission.10    e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in 11accordance with the bylaws.12    f. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are 13consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.14    g. The Commission shall have the following powers:15        1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and 16    coordinate implementation and administration of this 17    Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law 18    and shall be binding in all party states;19        2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions 20    in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing 21    of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable 22    law shall not be affected;23        3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;24        4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of 25    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 26    party state or nonprofit organizations;  HB4369- 23 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        5. To cooperate with other organizations that 2    administer state compacts related to the regulation of 3    nursing, including but not limited to sharing 4    administrative or staff expenses, office space or other 5    resources;6        6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 7    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 8    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this 9    Compact, and to establish the Commission's personnel 10    policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 11    qualifications of personnel and other related personnel 12    matters;13        7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants 14    and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and 15    services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 16    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 17    appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;18        8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 19    donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, 20    any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided 21    that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 22    appearance of impropriety;23        9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 24    abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether 25    real, personal or mixed;26        10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;  HB4369- 24 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        11. To borrow money;2        12. To appoint committees, including advisory 3    committees comprised of administrators, state nursing 4    regulators, state legislators or their representatives, 5    and consumer representatives, and other such interested 6    persons;7        13. To provide and receive information from, and to 8    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;9        14. To adopt and use an official seal; and10        15. To perform such other functions as may be 11    necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this 12    Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse 13    licensure and practice.14    h. Financing of the Commission15        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 16    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 17    organization and ongoing activities.18        2. The Commission may also levy on and collect an 19    annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost 20    of its operations, activities and staff in its annual 21    budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual 22    assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a 23    formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall 24    promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states.25        3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 26    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the   HB4369- 25 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 2    the party states, except by, and with the authority of, 3    such party state.4        4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 5    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 6    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 7    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 8    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 9    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 10    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 11    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 12    of the Commission.13    i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification14        1. The administrators, officers, executive director, 15    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 16    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 17    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 18    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 19    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 20    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 21    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 22    basis for believing occurred, within the scope of 23    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 24    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 25    to protect any such person from suit or liability for any 26    damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the   HB4369- 26 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.2        2. The Commission shall defend any administrator, 3    officer, executive director, employee or representative of 4    the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose 5    liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error 6    or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 7    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person 8    against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for 9    believing occurred within the scope of Commission 10    employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that 11    nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person 12    from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided 13    further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission 14    did not result from that person's intentional, willful or 15    wanton misconduct.16        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 17    any administrator, officer, executive director, employee 18    or representative of the Commission for the amount of any 19    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 20    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 21    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 22    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such 23    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 24    within the scope of Commission employment, duties or 25    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 26    error or omission did not result from the intentional,   HB4369- 27 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.  2ARTICLE VIII 3Rulemaking 4    a. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 5pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Article and the 6rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 7binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and 8shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this 9Compact.10    b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 11regular or special meeting of the Commission.12    c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or 13rules by the Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in 14advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and 15voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed 16rulemaking:17        1. On the website of the Commission; and18        2. On the website of each licensing board or the 19    publication in which each state would otherwise publish 20    proposed rules.21    d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:22        1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting 23    in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;24        2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the   HB4369- 28 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    reason for the proposed rule;2        3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from 3    any interested person; and4        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 5    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 6    public hearing and any written comments.7    e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission 8shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions 9and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.10    f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 11hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.12    g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date 13of the scheduled public hearing.14        1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 15    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 16    opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings 17    will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon 18    request.19        2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 20    requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be 21    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 22    required by this section.23    h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission 24may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.25    i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 26of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was   HB4369- 29 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 2comments received.3    j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all 4administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and 5shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based 6on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.7    k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 8Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 9prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided 10that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact 11and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule 12as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 13(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the 14purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must 15be adopted immediately in order to:16        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or 17    welfare;18        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; 19    or20        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 21    administrative rule that is required by federal law or 22    rule.23    l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously 24adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting 25typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency 26or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be   HB4369- 30 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be 2subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) 3days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on 4grounds that the revision results in a material change to a 5rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to 6the Commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no 7challenge is made, the revision will take effect without 8further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 9may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.  10ARTICLE IX 11Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement 12    a. Oversight13        1. Each party state shall enforce this Compact and 14    take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate 15    this Compact's purposes and intent.16        2. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 17    of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, 18    responsibilities or actions of the Commission, and shall 19    have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all 20    purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such 21    proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or 22    order void as to the Commission, this Compact or 23    promulgated rules.24    b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination  HB4369- 31 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        1. If the Commission determines that a party state has 2    defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 3    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 4    rules, the Commission shall:5            i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state 6        and other party states of the nature of the default, 7        the proposed means of curing the default or any other 8        action to be taken by the Commission; and9            ii. Provide remedial training and specific 10        technical assistance regarding the default.11        2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the 12    defaulting state's membership in this Compact may be 13    terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the 14    administrators, and all rights, privileges and benefits 15    conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the 16    effective date of termination. A cure of the default does 17    not relieve the offending state of obligations or 18    liabilities incurred during the period of default.19        3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be 20    imposed only after all other means of securing compliance 21    have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or 22    terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor 23    of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of 24    the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the 25    party states.26        4. A state whose membership in this Compact has been   HB4369- 32 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1    terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations 2    and liabilities incurred through the effective date of 3    termination, including obligations that extend beyond the 4    effective date of termination.5        5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to 6    a state that is found to be in default or whose membership 7    in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in 8    writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.9        6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the 10    Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 11    District of Columbia or the federal district in which the 12    Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party 13    shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including 14    reasonable attorneys' fees.15    c. Dispute Resolution16        1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall 17    attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that 18    arise among party states and between party and non-party 19    states.20        2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing 21    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 22    disputes, as appropriate.23        3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes 24    among party states arising under this Compact:25            i. The party states may submit the issues in 26        dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be   HB4369- 33 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1        comprised of individuals appointed by the Compact 2        administrator in each of the affected party states and 3        an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact 4        administrators of all the party states involved in the 5        dispute.6            ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators 7        shall be final and binding.8    d. Enforcement9        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 10    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 11    Compact.12        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 13    action in the U.S. District Court for the District of 14    Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission 15    has its principal offices against a party state that is in 16    default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this 17    Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief 18    sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In 19    the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the 20    prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such 21    litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.22        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 23    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any 24    other remedies available under federal or state law.  25ARTICLE X HB4369- 34 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment 2    a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the 3earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this Compact 4into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 52018. All party states to this Compact, that also were parties 6to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this 7Compact, ("Prior Compact"), shall be deemed to have withdrawn 8from said Prior Compact within six (6) months after the 9effective date of this Compact.10    b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to 11recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice 12in that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such 13party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.14    c. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by 15enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state's 16withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after 17enactment of the repealing statute.18    d. A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not 19affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or 20terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions 21and significant investigations occurring prior to the 22effective date of such withdrawal or termination.23    e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 24invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other 25cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party   HB4369- 35 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of 2this Compact.3    f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No 4amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 5upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the 6laws of all party states.7    g. Representatives of non-party states to this Compact 8shall be invited to participate in the activities of the 9Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of 10this Compact by all states.  11ARTICLE XI 12Construction and Severability 13This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate 14the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be 15severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of 16this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of 17any party state or of the United States, or if the 18applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 19circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of 20this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, 21agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. 22If this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the 23constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain in 24full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in   HB4369- 36 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all 2severable matters.  3    (225 ILCS 65/85-10 new)4    Sec. 85-10. State labor laws. The Nurse Licensure Compact 5does not supersede existing State labor laws. 6    (225 ILCS 65/85-15 new)7    Sec. 85-15. Criminal history record checks. The State may 8not share with or disclose to the Interstate Commission of 9Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators or any other state any 10of the contents of a nationwide criminal history records check 11conducted for the purpose of multistate licensure under the 12Nurse Licensure Compact. 13    (225 ILCS 65/85-20 new)14    Sec. 85-20. Continuing education. Nurses subject to the 15Nurse Licensure Compact shall complete 20 hours of approved 16continuing education in every 2-year license renewal cycle. 17The continuing education hours shall include, but not be 18limited to, the completion of the following mandatory courses: 19mandated reporter training for abused and neglected children, 20Alzheimer's disease education, implicit bias training, and 21sexual harassment training. An employer who employs nurses who 22are subject to the Nurse Licensure Compact shall provide such 23nurses with the opportunity to obtain the required continuing   HB4369- 37 -LRB104 17213 AAS 30633 b1education hours. 2    (225 ILCS 65/85-25 new)3    Sec. 85-25. Advanced practice registered nurses. The 4compact in this Article does not apply to an advanced practice 5registered nurse. 6    (225 ILCS 65/85-30 new)7    Sec. 85-30. Employer attestation. On the effective date of 8the Nurse Licensure Compact, employers who intend to hire or 9who have hired a nurse with a multistate license issued from a 10state other than this State must attest to the following:11        (1) The nurse has submitted the required demographic 12    information. The required demographic information shall 13    include the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center's supply 14    survey or any other demographic data survey required by 15    the Board as a condition of employment.16        (2) The nurse has completed the required hours of 17    continuing education for licensure renewal, as required in 18    Section 85-20. The employer shall report its attestation 19    of the nurse's completion of such hours on a form 20    developed by the Department within 30 days after employing 21    the nurse.